Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3,113.05
Handicapped or disabled persons; parking permit; expiration date; permit for temporarily handicapped or disabled person; period valid; renewal.

(1) Permanently issued handicapped or disabled parking permits shall be valid for a period ending on the last day of the month of the applicant's birthday in the sixth year after issuance and shall expire on that day.

(2) All handicapped or disabled parking permits for temporarily handicapped or disabled persons shall be issued for a period ending either three months after the date of issuance or six months after the date of issuance, with such period to be based on the estimated date of recovery, but such permit may be renewed one time for a similar three-month or six-month period. For the renewal period, there shall be submitted an additional application with proof of a handicap or disability.

Laws 2011, LB163, § 27;

Laws 2013, LB31, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB657, § 9;

Laws 2016, LB865, § 2.